North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-09.4 Public Finance Authority
6-09.4-23.
Evidences of indebtedness — Authority to withhold school district state aid.

If the public finance authority or a paying agent notifies the superintendent of public instruction, in writing, that a school district has failed to pay when due the principal or interest on any evidences of indebtedness issued after July 31, 1999, or that the public finance authority, school district, or the paying agent has reason to believe a school district will not be able to make a full payment of the principal and interest when the payment is due, the superintendent of public instruction shall withhold any funds that are due or payable or appropriated to the school district under chapter 15.1-27 until the payment of the principal or interest has been made to the public finance authority or the paying agent, or until the public finance authority, school district, or the paying agent notifies the superintendent of public instruction that arrangements satisfactory to the public finance authority or the paying agent have been made for the payment of the principal and interest then due and owing. The notification must include information required by the superintendent of public instruction. State funds available to a school district under chapter 15.1-27 are not subject to withholding under this section unless the withholding is authorized by resolution of the district’s school board.

Notification by the public finance authority, school district, or the paying agent that satisfactory arrangements have been made for the payment of the principal and interest then due and owing under subsection 1 must be made at least fifteen working days before the principal or interest is due. The notice must be in writing and include the name of the school district, an identification of the debt obligation issue, the date the payment is due, the amount of principal and interest due on the payment date, the amount of principal or interest the school district will be unable to pay, the paying agent for the debt obligation, the wire transfer instructions to transfer funds to the paying agent, and an indication that payment is requested under this section. A paying agent shall notify the superintendent of public instruction if the paying agent becomes aware of a potential default. If the superintendent receives notice of a requested payment under this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall withhold and transfer funds due or payable or appropriated to the school district under chapter 15.1-27 to the paying agent after:

Consulting with the school district and the paying agent; and

Verifying the accuracy of the provided request information.

Notwithstanding any withholding of state funds under section 15-39.1-23 or any other law, the superintendent of public instruction shall make available any funds withheld under subsection 1 to the public finance authority or the paying agent. The public finance authority or the paying agent shall apply the funds to payments that the school district is required to make to the public finance authority or the paying agent.

If funds are withheld from a school district and made available to the public finance authority or a paying agent under this section and if tax revenues are received by the school district during the fiscal year in which the funds are withheld and are deposited in the district’s sinking fund established in accordance with section 21-03-42, the district, with the consent of the public finance authority or the paying agent, may withdraw from its sinking fund an amount equal to that withheld by the superintendent of public instruction and made available to the public finance authority or a paying agent under this section.

Any excess funds at the Bank of North Dakota escrowed pursuant to an agreement between the public finance authority and the state board of public school education for the benefit of the public finance authority and a school district must be held by the Bank. With the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, those funds may be used to subsidize the debt service payments on construction loans that are made to school districts by the public finance authority and which are subject to the withholding provisions of this section or construction loans made to school districts under the state school construction program established by section 11 of chapter 2 of the 1989 Session Laws. Notwithstanding the existence of an escrow agreement between the public finance authority and the state board of public school education, those funds must be transferred to the public finance authority upon certification by the public finance authority that the funds are in excess of the amount needed to provide for the payment in full of the outstanding principal and interest, when due, on the public finance authority bonds issued to purchase the municipal securities for which the escrow fund was established.

The superintendent of public instruction shall develop detailed procedures for school districts to notify the superintendent of public instruction that they have obligated themselves to be bound by the provisions of this section; procedures for school districts, paying agents, and the public finance authority to notify the superintendent of public instruction of potential defaults and to request payment under this section; and procedures for the state to expedite payments to prevent defaults.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 86, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 1; 2005, ch. 89, § 22; 2011, ch. 80, § 1; 2017, ch. 78, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

6-09.4-24.
Public finance authority — Issuance on behalf of other state agencies.

The public finance authority may issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness on behalf of other state agencies, instrumentalities, or officers, including the farm finance agency, industrial commission, North Dakota building authority, student loan trust, and any other state agency, instrumentality, or officer authorized by law to issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness and which elects to enter into an administrative agreement with the public finance authority under this chapter. The public finance authority may be assisted by any other official appointed by the industrial commission to aid the executive director or to serve as an authorized officer of the public finance authority from time to time. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in issuing bonds or other evidences of indebtedness and in administering or managing any bond issue postissuance on behalf of any other state agency, instrumentality, or officer, the public finance authority may exercise any of the powers and authority of that state agency, instrumentality, or officer which the industrial commission determines to be necessary or expedient in the issuance of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness or in the administration or management of the issue. Any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the public finance authority on behalf of any other state agency, instrumentality, or officer, if so determined by the industrial commission, continues to be the obligation or liability of the state agency or instrumentality as otherwise provided by law and not an obligation or liability of the public finance authority.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 89, § 23.

6-09.4-25.
Administrative agreements with state agencies and instrumentalities to issue bonds and other evidences of indebtedness.

The public finance authority and any state agency, instrumentality, or officer authorized by law to issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness to obtain funds for any authorized purpose may enter into an administrative agreement. The agreement may delegate to the public finance authority the power and authority to issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness on behalf of the state agency, instrumentality, or officer to obtain funds for any other purpose authorized by law and may contain such other necessary or expedient terms and conditions as the industrial commission and the parties to the administrative agreement approve to effect the issuance of the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness and to aid in the administration or management of any bond issue after issuance.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 89, § 24.

6-09.4-26.
Public finance authority as continuation of and successor in interest to municipal bond bank.

Beginning August 1, 2005, the public finance authority is deemed the continuation of and successor in interest to the municipal bond bank and any reference to the municipal bond bank or bond bank in any agreement, certificate, contract, covenant, indenture, resolution, recital, undertaking, bond, note, other evidence of indebtedness, or in any other document or instrument means the public finance authority.

The public finance authority as the continuation of and successor in interest to the municipal bond bank is deemed to:

Possess all rights, title, privileges, powers, immunities, property, assets, and claims of the bond bank; and

Fulfill and perform all obligations of the bond bank, including all bond bank obligations relating to outstanding bonds and notes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 89, § 25.

6-09.4-27.
Confidentiality of certain public finance authority records.

Commercial or financial information of a contracting party provided to the public finance authority as part of any qualified small issue bonds or municipal industrial revenue bonds purchased or issued by the public finance authority, whether obtained directly or indirectly, are confidential records. Confidential records do not include routine credit inquiries; records required to be disclosed by due legal process; the name, address, and contact information of a contracting party; or the amount loaned to a contracting party.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 92, § 1.